Strategic Management: Theory & Cases: An Integrated Approach 

Chapter 8 
Strategy in the Global Environment 

Opening Case:
Emirates Global Strategy 
Emirates is one of the world’s largest airlines. As of January 2022, they provided service to more than 150 cities in 80 countries across the globe through a fleet of 270 aircraft. Emirates ranks fourth in the world by total scheduled passenger kilometers flown. The airline is also the second-largest cargo airline in the world behind Federal Express. Emirates was incorporated in 1985 in Dubai, the most populous city in the United Arab Emirates and the capital of the Emirate of Dubai. The air-line, which is state owned, started its operations with just two aircraft. 
If Emirates had followed the standard pattern on smaller start-up airlines, it perhaps would have established a number of short-haul routes, serving other locations in the Middle East. In fact, it pursued a radically different global strategy. Using Dubai as a hub, Emirates positioned itself as a long-haul, low-cost global carrier, with ambitions to connect the world through Dubai. Dubai’s location on the Persian Gulf was strategically valuable because it was ideally positioned to connect the West and East. Still, it was an audacious strategy. Emirates’ business model was focused purely on purchasing wide-bodied long-haul aircraft that would be able to link any two points on the globe through its 24-hour hub in Dubai. To support this strategy, Emirates emerged as the largest operator of Airbus’ A380 superjumbo jets. Indeed, Emirates operates nearly half of all A380s ever delivered. The company also has the world’s largest fleet of long-haul Boeing 777 aircraft.  
This strategy has given Emirates a cost advantage that comes from several sources. First, if it can fill its fuel-efficient wide-bodied jets, the operating cost per passenger mile will be lower than for airlines that operate a mixed fleet of long-haul and short-haul jets, as do all other major airlines. Short-haul networks tend to be more expensive to operate, with higher costs per passenger mile. Second, as a relatively new airline, Emirates does not have the legacy costs associated with high la-bor costs, pension requirements, union work rules, and the like that burden many long-established airlines (to say nothing of the fact that unions are rare in Dubai). Third, the corporate tax rate in Dubai is zero, which is another source of cost advantage. 
Despite its relatively low operating costs, it would be incorrect to think of Emirates as a low-cost airline in the mode of Southwest or Ryanair. Far from it, Emirates offers a full complement of first-and business-class seating, premium in-flight service, and lounges in airports for business and first-class travelers. In 2019, Emirates was 10th out of 80 global airlines ranked by AirHelp by on-time performance, service quality, and claim processing. Measured on service quality alone, Emirates was ranked number one in the world by AirHelp. The double advantage of being able to offer high-quality service at a low cost goes a long way to explaining Emirates’ emergence as one of the world’s major airlines. Its strong global brand helped to drive demand, which resulted in full aircraft and lower operating costs. 
Another interesting aspect of its strategy concerns its partnership with the Dubai government to promote Dubai as a leisure destination for tourists, as well as for business and professional con-ventions. The city has many luxury hotels, restaurants, clubs, beaches, amusement parks, shopping malls, and so on, turning it into a destination, rather than just a hub. This strategy creates more demand and helps to fill incoming and outbound aircraft, which further lowers Emirates’ operating costs. 
Despite all its advantages, however, Emirates has been particularly hard hit by the sharp decline in airline travel resulting from the COVID-19 global pandemic. As airline travel slumped in 2020, Emirates could no longer fill its A380s and 777 aircraft, operating costs surged, and losses mount-ed. The company has canceled orders for additional A380s, and in anticipation of several years of depressed demand due to the pandemic, for the first time it is adding some smaller aircraft to its long-haul mix. To shore up demand, the airline is also looking to boost its strategy of bringing more travelers to Dubai for vacations and conventions, hoping this will help to fill its aircraft.

Overview
One striking development during the last five decades has been the globalization of markets. As a result of declining barriers to cross-border trade and investment, along with the rapid economic development of countries like Brazil, India, and China, seg-mented national markets have increasingly merged into much larger global markets. In this chapter, we discuss the implications of this phase shift in the global competitive environment for strategic management. We will also discuss recent countertrends that suggest something of a retreat from globalization may be underway. 
The chapter begins with a discussion of ongoing changes in the global competi-tive environment. Next, it discusses the various ways in which global expansion can increase a company’s profitability and profit growth. We then discuss the advantages and disadvantages of the different strategies companies can pursue to gain a com-petitive advantage in the global marketplace. This is followed by a discussion of two related strategic issues: (1) how managers decide which foreign markets to enter, when to enter them, and on what scale; and (2) what kind of vehicle or method a company should use to expand globally and enter a foreign country. 
The overview of the strategy of Emirates presented in the Opening Case illustrates some of the issues we will touch on in this chapter. Over the last 30 years, Emirates has emerged as one of the world’s largest airlines by pursuing a global strategy, efficiently connecting the world through its hub in Dubai. The fact that Emirates is now strug-gling with the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on its revenues and costs does not invalidate its established strategy, but it does point to the need for strategic adaptation to respond to unanticipated changes in the macro environment. 


8-1 Global and National Environments 
Fifty years ago, most national markets were isolated from one another by significant barriers to international trade and investment. In those days, managers could focus on analyzing only those national markets in which their company competed. They did not need to pay much attention to entry by global competitors, for there were few and entry was difficult. Nor did they need to pay much attention to entering foreign mar-kets because that was often prohibitively expensive. Over the last half-century, much of this has changed. Barriers to international trade and investment have tumbled; huge global markets for goods and services have been created; and companies from different nations are entering each other’s home markets on an unprecedented scale, increasing the intensity of competition. Rivalry can no longer be understood merely in terms of what happens within the boundaries of a nation; managers now need to consider how globalization is impacting the environment in which their company competes, and what strategies their company should adopt to exploit the unfolding opportunities and counter competitive threats. In this section, we look at the changes ushered in by falling barriers to international trade and investment, and we discuss a model for analyzing the competitive situation in different nations.

8-1a The Globalization of Production and Markets
The past half-century has seen a dramatic lowering of barriers to international trade and investment. For example, the average tariff rate on manufactured goods traded between advanced nations has fallen from around 40 to under 4%. For some goods, such as information technology, tariff rates have approached zero. Similarly, in nation after nation, regulations prohibiting foreign companies from entering domestic mar-kets and establishing production facilities, or acquiring domestic companies, have been removed. As a result, there has been a surge in both the volume of international trade and the value of foreign direct investment (FDI). Indeed, the volume of world trade and foreign direct investment has been growing faster than the global economy for decades. Between 1960 and 2022, the value of the world economy (adjusted for inflation) increased nine times, while the value of international trade in merchandised goods increased more than 20 times. This underestimates the growth in trade, because trade in services has also been growing rapidly in recent decades. By 2021, the value of world trade in merchandised goods was $22.2 trillion, while the value of trade in services was $5.7 trillion. Although international trade slumped by as much as 20% in 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic, trade in goods bounced back strongly in 2021, hitting record levels. As for foreign direct investment, between 1990 and 2021, the total flow of foreign direct investment from all countries increased from $250 billion to $1.85 trillion as companies invested in each other’s markets (as with trade, there was a big slump in FDI in 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic, but investment flows bounced back in 2021). These trends have led to the globalization of production and the globalization of markets. 
	The globalization of production has been increasing as companies take advantage of lower barriers to international trade and investment to disperse important functions of their production processes around the globe. Doing so enables them to exploit national differences in the cost and quality of factors of production such as labor, energy, land, and capital, which allows companies to lower their cost struc-tures and boost profits. For example, foreign companies build nearly 65% by value of Boeing’s 787 commercial jet aircraft. Three Japanese companies build 35% of the 787, and another 20% is allocated to companies located in Italy, Singapore, and the United Kingdom. Part of Boeing’s rationale for outsourcing so much production to foreign suppliers is that these suppliers are the best in the world at performing their activity. Therefore, the result of having foreign suppliers build specific parts is a better final product and higher profitability for Boeing. Apple has had a similar experience. Strategy in Action 8.1 describes how it has configured its global supply chain in order to gain a competitive advantage in the smartphone business. 
	As for the globalization of markets, it has been argued that the world’s economic system is moving from one in which national markets are distinct entities, isolated from each other by trade barriers and barriers of distance, time, and culture, toward a system in which national markets are merging into one huge, global marketplace. Increasingly, customers around the world demand and use the same basic product offerings. Consequently, in many industries, it is no longer meaningful to talk about the German market, the U.S. market, or the Chinese market; there is only the global market. The global acceptance of Coca-Cola, Citigroup credit cards, Starbucks, McDonald’s hamburgers, Samsung and Apple smartphones, IKEA furniture, and Microsoft’s Windows operating system are examples of this trend. 
	The trend toward the globalization of production and markets has several import-ant implications for competition within an industry. First, industry boundaries do not stop at national borders. Because many industries are becoming global in scope, com-petitors and potential future competitors exist not only in a company’s home market but also in international markets. Managers who analyze only their home market can be caught unprepared by the entry of efficient foreign competitors. The globaliza-tion of markets and production implies that companies around the globe are finding their home markets under attack from foreign competitors. For example, in Japan, American financial institutions such as J.P. Morgan have been making inroads against Japanese financial service institutions. In the United States, South Korea’s Samsung has been battling Apple for a share of the smartphone market. In the European Union (EU), the once-dominant Dutch company Philips has seen its market share in the cus-tomer electronics industry diminished by Japan’s Panasonic and Sony, and Samsung of South Korea.
	Second, the shift from national to global markets has intensified competitive rivalry in many industries. National markets that once were consolidated oligopolies dominated by three or four companies and subjected to relatively little foreign compe-tition, have been transformed into segments of fragmented, global industries in which many companies battle each other for market share in many countries. This rivalry has threatened to drive down profitability and made it more critical for companies to maximize their efficiency, quality, customer responsiveness, and innovative ability. The painful restructuring and downsizing that has been occurring at companies such as the once-dominant photographic company Kodak is as much a response to the increased intensity of global competition as it is to any other factor. However, not all global industries are fragmented. Many remain consolidated oligopolies, except that now they are consolidated, global (rather than national) oligopolies. In the videogame industry, for example, three companies are battling for global dominance: Microsoft from the United States and Nintendo and Sony from Japan. In the market for smart-phones, Apple is in a global battle with Samsung from South Korea and Huawei Tech-nologies from China. 
Finally, although globalization has increased both the threat of entry and the intensity of rivalry within many formerly protected national markets, it has also cre-ated enormous opportunities for companies based in those markets. The steady decline in barriers to cross-border trade and investment has opened many once-protected national markets to companies based outside these nations. Thus, for example, West-ern European, Japanese, and U.S. companies have accelerated their investment in the nations of Eastern Europe, Latin America, and Southeast Asia as they try to take advantage of growth opportunities in those areas. 

8-2 Countertrends to Globalization
Despite the half-century shift towards greater globalization, it should be noted that, since 2016, there have been some notable countertrends to the march toward globaliza-tion. First, in June 2016, the United Kingdom voted to exit from the EU, the world’s largest and in many ways most successful trading block. The EU has removed barriers to cross-border trade and investment between its 28 member countries, and it has been strongly in support of lowering those barriers globally. The so-called “Brexit” seems to signify a shift away from what has been a consensus that greater globalization is a good thing. Britain’s exit from the EU was finalized in 2020, and since then the United Kingdom has been struggling to adjust to a different trading environment. 
Then, in November 2016, Donald Trump—who articulated explicitly protec-tionist views—was elected to the presidency of the United States. After assuming office, Trump withdrew the United States from the proposed Transpacific Part-nership, which would have lowered tariff barriers between 12 Pacific Rim nations (excluding China), renegotiated the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) between Canada, Mexico, and the United States (replacing it with the United States-Mexico-Canada Agreement that went into effect in 2020), raised tariffs on imports of solar panels, washing machines, steel, and aluminum into the United States, and imposed tariffs of 25% on a wide range of imports from China. China, it should be noted, responded in kind, raising tariffs on a wide range of U.S. imports into China. Similarly, many other countries impacted by the tariffs on steel and aluminum imports into the United States imposed retaliatory tariffs on American exports to their markets. This was a striking development. Since the end of World War II, America has been a leader on the international stage pushing for lower barriers to cross-border trade and investment, but under Trump’s leader-ship it seemed to be taking the opposite tack. The election of Joe Biden to the pres-idency in 2021 does not appear to have resulted in a fundamental shift back to the post-Trump era. As of mid-2022, the tariffs on China were still in place, although the Biden administration had reduced some of the tariffs placed on imports of steel and aluminum from the EU. 
To further complicate matters, we are witnessing something of a geopolitical realignment that may constrain globalization going forward. Russia’s invasion of Ukraine in February 2022 has, at a minimum, recast relationships between that coun-try and the West. Russia, once seen as a partner in the global economy and a vibrant emerging market offering a host of opportunities for international businesses, is now effectively closed off from much of the rest of the world by prohibitive sanctions. Many Western businesses have exited that country entirely, writing off billions in investments. The Russian economy itself is set to shrink significantly due to these sanctions. Unless there is a significant change in regime in Russia, history suggests that this situation could persist for some time. 
Finally, under the leadership of Xi Jinping, China has also slipped back into greater authoritarianism and state control of economic activity, which could have a potentially chilling effect on private enterprise in that nation. This would jeopardize China’s position as a major source of global production and exports, and a major market opportunity for international businesses. There is also a risk that an author-itarian China will take aggressive action to bring Taiwan, once a Chinese province, back under its control. If that happens, it seems highly probably that the West will respond with significant economic sanctions (as they did with Russia’s invasion of Ukraine), which would result in a major disruption of trade and investment flows. 
Although these policy shifts and geopolitical developments are still unfolding at the time of writing, there is no doubt that if this countertrend continues it will signifi-cantly alter the environment within which international businesses have been operat-ing for the last quarter-century, and it may require many enterprises to make major shifts in their global strategy.

8-3 National Competitive Advantage
Despite the globalization of production and markets, many of the most successful companies in certain industries are still clustered in a small number of countries. For example, many of the world’s most successful biotechnology and computer companies are based in the United States, and many of the most successful consumer electronics companies are based in Japan, Taiwan, South Korea, and China. Germany is the base for many successful chemical and engineering companies. These facts suggest that the nation-state within which a company is based may have an important bearing on the competitive position of that company in the global marketplace. 
In a study of national competitive advantage, Michael Porter identified four attri-butes of a national or country-specific environment that have an important impact on the global competitiveness of companies located within that nation: 
Factor endowments: A nation’s position in factors of production such as skilled labor or the infrastructure necessary to compete in each industry
Local demand conditions: The nature of home demand for the industry’s product or service 
Related and supporting industries: The presence or absence in a nation of supplier industries and related industries that are internationally competitive
Firm strategy, structure, and rivalry: The conditions in the nation governing how companies are created, organized, and managed, and the nature of domestic rivalry 
	Porter speaks of these four attributes as constituting the “diamond,” arguing that companies from a given nation are most likely to succeed in industries or strategic groups in which the four attributes are favorable (see Figure 8.1). He also argues that the diamond’s attributes form a mutually reinforcing system in which the effect of one attribute is dependent on the state of others.



Factor Endowments – Factor endowments—the cost and quality of factors of production—are a prime determinant of the competitive advantage that certain countries might have in certain industries. Factors of production include basic factors such as land, la-bor, capital, and raw materials, and advanced factors such as technological know-how, managerial sophistication, and physical infrastructure (roads, railways, and ports). The competitive advantage that the United States enjoys in biotechnology might be explained by the presence of certain advanced factors of production—for example, technological know-how—in combination with some basic factors, such as a pool of relatively low-cost venture capital that can be used to fund risky start-ups in industries such as biotechnology.

Local Demand Conditions – Home demand plays an important role in providing the impetus for “upgrading” competitive advantage. Companies are typically most sensi-tive to the needs of their closest customers. Thus, the characteristics of home demand are particularly important in shaping the attributes of domestically made products and creating pressures for innovation and quality. A nation’s companies gain compet-itive advantage if their domestic customers are sophisticated and demanding, and if they pressure local companies to meet high standards of product quality and produce innovative products. Japan’s sophisticated, knowledgeable buyers of cameras helped stimulate the Japanese camera industry to improve product quality and introduce in-novative models. A similar example can be found in the cellphone equipment industry, where sophisticated, demanding local customers in Scandinavia helped push Nokia of Finland and Ericsson of Sweden to invest in cellular phone technology long before demand for cellular phones increased in other developed nations. As a result, Nokia, and Ericsson, together with Motorola, became significant players in the global cellular telephone equipment industry. 

Competitiveness of Related and Supporting Industries – The third broad attribute of national advantage in an industry is the presence of internationally competitive sup-pliers or related industries. The benefits of investment in advanced factors of produc-tion by related and supporting businesses can spill over into a given industry and help it to achieve a strong competitive position internationally. Swedish strength in fabri-cated steel products such as ball bearings and cutting tools has drawn on strengths in Sweden’s specialty-steel industry. Switzerland’s success in pharmaceuticals is closely related to its previous international success in the technologically related dye industry. One consequence of this process is that successful industries within a country tend to be grouped into clusters of related industries. Indeed, this is one of the most pervasive findings of Porter’s study. One such cluster is the German textile and apparel sector, which includes high-quality cotton, wool, synthetic fibers, sewing-machine needles, and a wide range of textile machinery. 

Intensity of Rivalry – The fourth broad attribute of national competitive advantage in Porter’s model is the intensity of rivalry of firms within a nation. Porter makes two important points. First, different nations are characterized by different management ideologies, which either help them or do not help them to build national competitive advantage. For example, Porter noted the predominance of engineers in top man-agement at German and Japanese firms. He attributed this to these firms’ emphasis on improving manufacturing processes and product design. In contrast, Porter noted a predominance of people with finance backgrounds leading many U.S. firms. He linked this to U.S. firms’ lack of attention to improving manufacturing processes and product design. He argued that the dominance of finance led to an overemphasis on maximizing short-term financial returns. According to Porter, one consequence of these different management ideologies was a relative loss of U.S. competitiveness in those engineering-based industries where manufacturing processes and product design issues are all-important (such as the automobile industry). 
Porter’s second point is that there is a strong association between vigorous domes-tic rivalry and the creation and persistence of competitive advantage in an indus-try. Rivalry compels companies to look for ways to improve efficiency, which makes them better international competitors. Domestic rivalry creates pressures to innovate, improve quality, reduce costs, and invest in upgrading advanced factors. All of this helps to create world-class competitors. 

Using the Framework – The framework just described can help managers identify where their most significant global competitors are likely to originate. For example, a cluster of computer service and software companies in Bangalore, India, includes two of the largest information technology companies in the world, Infosys and Wipro. These companies have emerged as aggressive competitors in the global market. Both companies have offices in the EU and United States so they can better compete against Western rivals such as IBM and Hewlett Packard, and both are gaining share in the global marketplace. 
The framework can also be used to help managers decide where they might want to locate certain productive activities. Seeking to take advantage of U.S. expertise in biotechnology, many foreign companies have set up research facilities in San Diego, Boston, and Seattle, where U.S. biotechnology companies tend to cluster. Similarly, to take advantage of Japanese success in consumer electronics, many U.S. electronics companies have set up research and production facilities in Japan, often in conjunc-tion with Japanese partners. 
Finally, the framework can help a company assess how tough it might be to enter
certain national markets. If a nation has a competitive advantage in certain industries, it might be challenging for foreigners to enter those industries. For example, the highly ompetitive retailing industry in the United States has proved to be a very difficult industry for foreign companies to enter. Successful foreign retailers such as Britain’s Tesco have found it tough going into the United States because the U.S. retailing industry is the most competitive in the world. 

8-4 Motives for Global Expansion
Expanding globally allows firms to increase their profitability and rate of profit growth in ways not available to purely domestic enterprises. Firms that operate internationally are able to: 
Expand the market for their domestic product offerings by selling those products in international markets.
Realize location economies by dispersing individual value creation activities to those locations around the globe where they can be performed most efficiently and effectively.
Realize greater cost economies from experience effects by serving an expanded global market from a central location, thereby reducing the costs of value creation.
Earn a greater return by leveraging valuable skills developed in foreign opera-tions and transferring them to other entities within the firm’s global network of operations.
As we will see, however, a firm’s ability to increase its profitability and profit growth by pursuing these strategies is constrained by the need to customize its product offering, marketing strategy, and business strategy to differing national or regional conditions—that is, by the imperative of localization.

8-4a Expanding the Market: Leveraging Products
A company can increase its growth rate by taking goods or services developed at home
and selling them internationally; almost all multinationals started out doing this. Procter & Gamble (P&G), for example, developed most of its bestselling products at home and then sold them around the world. Similarly, from its earliest days, Microsoft has focused on selling its software worldwide. Automobile companies such as Ford, Volkswagen, and Toyota Motor Corporation also grew by developing products at home and then selling them in international markets. The returns from such a strategy are likely to be greater if indigenous competitors in the nations a company enters lack comparable products. Thus, Toyota has grown its profits by entering the large automo-bile markets of North America and Europe and offering products differentiated from those offered by local rivals (Ford and GM) by superior quality and reliability. 
The success of many multinational companies that expand in this manner is based not just on the goods or services that they sell in foreign nations, but also upon the distinctive competencies (i.e., unique resources) that underlie the produc-tion and marketing of those goods or services. Thus, Toyota’s success is based on its distinctive competency in manufacturing automobiles. International expansion can be seen as a way for Toyota to generate greater returns from this competency. Similarly, P&G’s global success was based on more than its portfolio of consumer products; it was also based on the company’s competencies in mass marketing con-sumer goods. P&G grew rapidly in international markets between 1950 and 1990 because it was one of the most skilled mass-marketing enterprises in the world and could “out-market” indigenous competitors in the nations it entered. Global expansion was, therefore, a way of generating higher returns from its valuable, rare, and inimitable resources in marketing. 
The same can be said of companies engaged in the service sectors of an econ-omy, such as financial institutions, retailers, restaurant chains, and hotels. Expanding the market for their services often means replicating their business model in foreign nations (albeit with some changes to account for local differences, which we will dis-cuss in more detail shortly). Starbucks, for example, has expanded globally by taking the basic business model it developed in the United States and using that as a blueprint for establishing international operations. 

8-4b Realizing Cost Economies from Global Volume
In addition to growing profits more rapidly, a company can realize cost savings from economies of scale, thereby boosting profitability, by expanding its sales volume through international expansion. Such scale economies come from several sources. First, by spreading the fixed costs associated with developing a product and setting up production facilities over its global sales volume, a company can lower its average unit cost. Thus, Microsoft garnered significant scale economies by spreading the $5-to $10-billion cost of developing Windows 10 over global demand. 
Second, by serving a global market, a company can potentially utilize its production facilities more intensively, which leads to higher productivity, lower costs, and greater profitability. For example, if Intel sold microprocessors solely in the United States, it might be able to keep its factories open only for one shift, 5 days a week. But by serv-ing a global market from the same factories, it might be able to utilize those assets for two shifts, 7 days a week. In other words, the capital invested in those factories is used more intensively if Intel sells to a global—as opposed to a national—market, which translates into higher capital productivity and a higher return on invested capital. 
Third, as global sales increase the size of the enterprise, its bargaining power with suppliers increases, which may allow it to bargain down the cost of key inputs and boost profitability that way. For example, Walmart uses its enormous sales volume as a lever to bargain down the price it pays to suppliers for merchandise sold through its stores. 
In addition to the cost savings that come from economies of scale, companies that sell to a global rather than a local marketplace may be able to realize further cost sav-ings from learning effects. We first discussed learning effects in Chapter 5, where we noted that employee productivity increases with cumulative increases in output over time. (For example, it costs considerably less to build the 100th aircraft from a Boeing assembly line than the 10th, because employees learn how to perform their tasks more efficiently over time.) Selling to a global market may enable a company to increase its sales volume more rapidly—and thus increase the cumulative output from its plants—which in turn should result in accelerated learning, higher employee productivity, and a cost advantage over competitors that are growing more slowly because they lack international markets. 

8-4c Realizing Location Economies
Earlier in this chapter, we discussed how countries differ along several dimensions, including differences in the cost and quality of factors of production. These differ-ences imply that some locations are more suited than others for producing certain goods and services. Location economies are the economic benefits that arise from per-forming a value creation activity in the optimal location for that activity, wherever in the world that might be (transportation costs and trade barriers permitting). Thus, if the best designers for a product live in France, a firm should base its design operations in France. If the most productive labor force for assembly operations is in Mexico, assembly operations should be based in Mexico. If the best marketers are in the United States, the marketing strategy should be formulated in the United States—and so on. Apple, for example, designs the iPhone and develops the associated software in California, but undertakes final assembly in China precisely because the company believes that these are the best locations in the world for carrying out these different value creation activities. 
Locating a value creation activity in the optimal location for that activity can have one of two effects: (1) it can lower the costs of value creation, helping the company achieve a low-cost position; or (2) it can enable a company to differentiate its product offering, which gives it the option of charging a premium price or keeping prices low and using differenti-ation as a means of increasing sales volume. Thus, efforts to realize location economies are consistent with the business-level strategies of low cost and differentiation. 
In theory, a company that realizes location economies by dispersing each of its value creation activities to the optimal location for that activity should have a compet-itive advantage over a company that bases all of its value creation activities at a single location. It should be able to better differentiate its product offering and lower its cost structure more than its single-location competitor. In a world where competitive pressures are increasing, such a strategy may well become an imperative for survival. 
Introducing transportation costs and trade barriers can complicate the process of real-izing location economies. New Zealand might have a comparative advantage for low-cost auto-assembly operations, but high transportation costs make it an uneconomical location from which to serve global markets. Factoring transportation costs and trade barriers into the cost equation helps explain why some U.S. companies have shifted production from Asia to Mexico. Mexico has three distinct advantages over many Asian countries as a location for value creation activities: Mexico’s low labor costs and its proximity to the large U.S. market reduces transportation costs. Also, the United States-Mexico-Canada Agreement (USMCA), which is the successor to the North American Free Trade Agree-ment (NAFTA), has removed many trade barriers between Mexico, the United States, and Canada, increasing Mexico’s appeal as a production site for the North American market. Thus, although the relative costs of value creation are important, transportation costs and trade barriers also must be considered in location decisions.

8-4d Leveraging the Competencies of Global Subsidiaries
You will recall from Chapter 3 that competitive advantage is based upon valuable, rare, and inimitable resources, in particular process knowledge, intellectual property, and organiza-tional architecture. Initially, many multinational companies develop the valuable resources and competencies that underpin their competitive advantage in their home nation and then expand internationally, primarily by selling products and services based on those competencies. However, for more mature multinational enterprises that have already estab-lished a network of subsidiary operations in foreign markets, the development of valuable resources and competencies can just as well occur in foreign subsidiaries. 
Competencies can be created anywhere within a multinational’s global network of operations, wherever people have the opportunity and incentive to try new ways of doing things. The creation of resources and competencies—such as unique process knowledge that helps to lower the costs of production or enhance perceived value and support higher product pricing—is not the monopoly of the corporate center. 
Leveraging the valuable resources created within subsidiaries and applying them to other operations within the firm’s global network may create value. For example, McDonald’s is increasingly finding that its foreign franchisees are a source of valuable new ideas. Faced with slow growth in France, its local franchisees have begun to exper-iment with the menu, as well as the layout and theme of restaurants. Gone are the ubiquitous golden arches; gone too are many of the utilitarian chairs and tables and other plastic features of the fast-food giant. Many McDonald’s restaurants in France now have hardwood floors, exposed brick walls, and even armchairs. Half of the outlets in France have been upgraded to a level that would make them unrecognizable to an American. The menu, too, has been changed to include premier sandwiches, such as chicken on focaccia bread, priced some 30% higher than the average hamburger. In France, this strategy seems to be working. Following these changes, increases in same-store sales rose from 1% annually to 3.4%. Impressed with the impact, McDonald’s executives implemented similar changes at other restaurants in markets where same-store sales growth was sluggish, including the United States. 
For the managers of a multinational enterprise, this phenomenon creates import-ant new challenges. First, managers must have the humility to recognize that valuable resources can arise anywhere within the firm’s global network, not just at the cor-porate center. Second, they must establish an incentive system that encourages local employees to acquire and build new resources and competencies. This is not easy: Creating new competencies involves a degree of risk, and not all new skills add value. For every valuable idea created by a McDonald’s subsidiary in a foreign country, there may be several failures. The management of the multinational must install incentives that encourage employees to take necessary risks and reward them for successes, and not sanction them for taking risks that did not pan out. Third, managers must have a process for identifying when valuable new resources and competencies have been created in a subsidiary. Finally, they need to act as facilitators, helping to transfer valuable resources and competencies within the firm. 

8-5 Strategies for Competing in the Global Marketplace
Companies that compete in the global marketplace typically face two types of compet-itive pressures: pressures for cost reductions and pressures to be locally responsive (see Figure 8.2). These competitive pressures place conflicting demands on a company. 



Responding to pressures for cost reductions requires that a company attempt to min-imize its unit costs. To attain this goal, it may have to base its productive activities at the most favorable low-cost location. It may also need to offer a standardized product to the global marketplace to realize the cost savings that come from economies of scale and learning effects. On the other hand, responding to pressures to be locally respon-sive requires that a company differentiate its product offering and marketing strategy from country to country to accommodate the diverse demands arising from national differences in consumer tastes and preferences, business practices, distribution chan-nels, competitive conditions, and government policies. Because differentiation across countries can involve significant duplication and a lack of product standardization, it may raise costs. 
Whereas some companies, such as Company A in Figure 8.2, face high pressures for cost reductions and low pressures for local responsiveness, and others, such as Company B, face low pressures for cost reductions and high pressures for local respon-siveness, many companies are in the position of Company C. They face high pres-sures for both cost reductions and local responsiveness. Dealing with these conflicting and contradictory pressures is a difficult strategic challenge, primarily because local responsiveness tends to raise costs.

8-5a Pressures for Cost Reductions
In competitive global markets, international businesses often face pressures for cost reductions. To respond to these pressures, a firm must try to lower the costs of value creation. A manufacturer, for example, might mass-produce a standardized product at an optimal site to realize economies of scale and location economies. Alternatively, it might outsource certain functions to low-cost foreign suppliers to reduce costs. Thus, many computer companies have outsourced their telephone-based customer-service functions to India, where qualified technicians who speak English can be hired for a lower wage rate than in the United States. In the same vein, Walmart pushes its sup-pliers (which are manufacturers) to also lower their prices. In fact, the pressure that Walmart has placed on its suppliers to reduce prices has been cited as a major cause of the trend among North American manufacturers to shift production to China. A service business such as a bank might move back-office functions such as information processing to developing nations where wage rates are lower. 
Cost-reduction pressures can be particularly intense in industries producing com-modity-type products where meaningful differentiation on non-price factors is diffi-cult and price is the main competitive weapon. This tends to be the case for products that serve universal needs. Universal needs exist when the tastes and preferences of consumers in different nations are similar, if not identical, such as for bulk chemicals, petroleum, steel, sugar, and similar products. Pressures for cost reductions also exist for many industrial and consumer products—for example, semiconductor chips, per-sonal computers, Android smart phones, and liquid crystal display screens. Pressures for cost reductions are also intense in industries where major competitors are based in low-cost locations, where there is persistent excess capacity, and where consumers are powerful and face low switching costs. Many commentators have argued that the liberalization of the world trade and investment environment in recent decades, by facilitating greater international competition, has generally increased cost pressures. 

8-5b Pressures for Local Responsiveness
Pressures for local responsiveness arise from differences in consumer tastes and pref-erences, infrastructure and traditional practices, distribution channels, and host gov-ernment demands. Responding to pressures to be locally responsive requires that a company differentiate its products and marketing strategy from country to country to accommodate these factors, all of which tend to raise a company’s cost structure. 

Differences in Customer Tastes and Preferences – Strong pressures for local responsiveness emerge when customer tastes and preferences differ significantly between countries, as they may for historic or cultural reasons. In such cases, a multinational company’s prod-ucts and marketing message must be customized to appeal to the tastes and preferences of local customers. The company is then typically pressured to delegate its production and marketing responsibilities and functions to overseas subsidiaries. 
For example, the automobile industry in the 1980s and early 1990s moved toward the
creation of “world cars.” The idea was that global companies such as General Motors, Ford, and Toyota would be able to sell the same basic vehicle globally, sourcing it from cen-tralized production locations. If successful, the strategy would have enabled automobile companies to reap significant gains from global-scale economies. However, this strategy frequently ran aground upon the hard rocks of consumer reality. Consumers in differ-ent automobile markets have historically had different tastes and preferences, and these require different types of vehicles. North American consumers show a strong demand for pickup trucks. This is particularly true in the South and West, where many families have a pickup truck as a second or third vehicle. But in European countries, pickup trucks are seen purely as utility vehicles and are purchased primarily by firms rather than individuals. Consequently, the product mix and marketing message need to be tailored to take into account the different nature of demand in North America and Europe. 
Some commentators have argued that customer demands for local customization are on the decline worldwide. According to this argument, modern communications and transport technologies have created the conditions for a convergence of the tastes and preferences of customers from different nations. The result is the emergence of enormous global markets for standardized consumer products. The worldwide accep-tance of McDonald’s hamburgers, Coca-Cola, Zara clothes, and the Apple iPhone, all of which are sold globally as standardized products, is often cited as evidence of the increasing homogeneity of the global marketplace. 
However, this argument may not hold in many consumer-goods markets. Signifi-cant differences in consumer tastes and preferences still exist across nations and cul-tures. Managers in international businesses do not yet have the luxury of being able to ignore these differences, and they may not for a long time to come. 

Differences in Infrastructure and Traditional Practices – Pressures for local responsive-ness also arise from differences in infrastructure or traditional practices among coun-tries, creating a need to customize products accordingly. To meet this need, companies may have to delegate manufacturing and production functions to foreign subsidiaries. For example, in North America, consumer electrical systems are based on 110 volts, whereas in some European countries 240-volt systems are standard. Thus, domestic electrical appliances must be customized to take this difference in infrastructure into account. Traditional social practices also often vary across nations. In Britain, people drive on the left-hand side of the road, creating a demand for right-hand-drive cars, whereas in France and the rest of Europe, people drive on the right-hand side of the road (and therefore want left-hand-drive cars).

Differences in Distribution Channels – A company’s marketing strategies may have to be responsive to differences in distribution channels among countries, which may ne-cessitate delegating marketing functions to national subsidiaries. In the pharmaceu-tical industry, for example, the British and Japanese distribution system is radically different from the U.S. system. British and Japanese doctors will not accept or respond favorably to a U.S.-style, high-pressure sales force. Thus, pharmaceutical companies must adopt different marketing practices in Britain and Japan compared with the United States—soft sell versus hard sell. 
Similarly, Poland, Brazil, and Russia are all considered emerging markets, but
there are big differences in distribution systems across the three countries. For exam-ple, supermarkets account for a higher percentage of food sales in Brazil than either Poland or Russia. These differences in channels require that companies adapt their own distribution and sales strategies.

Host Government Demands – Finally, economic and political demands imposed by host country governments may require local responsiveness. For example, pharmaceu-tical companies are subject to local clinical testing, registration procedures, and pric-ing restrictions, all of which make it necessary that the manufacturing and marketing of a drug meet local requirements. Moreover, because governments and government agencies control a significant portion of the healthcare budget in most countries, they are in a powerful position to demand a high level of local responsiveness. More gen-erally, threats of protectionism, economic nationalism, and local content rules (which require that a certain percentage of a product be manufactured locally) can dictate that international businesses manufacture locally.

The Rise of Regionalism – Typically, we think of pressures for local responsiveness as deriving from national differences in tastes and preferences, infrastructure, and the like. While this is still often the case, there is also a tendency toward the convergence of tastes, preferences, infrastructure, distribution channels, and host government de-mands within a broader region that is composed of two or more nations. We some-times see this when there are strong pressures for convergence due to, for example, a shared history and culture, or the establishment of a trading block in a deliberate attempt to harmonize trade policies, infrastructure, regulations, and the like. 
The most obvious example of a region is the EU, and particularly the eurozone countries within that trade block, where institutional forces are pushing toward con-vergence. The creation of a single EU market, with a single currency, common business regulations, standard infrastructure, and so on, cannot help but result in the reduction of certain national differences between countries within the EU, and the creation of one regional rather than several national markets. Indeed, at the economic level at least, that is the explicit intent of the EU. 
Another example of regional convergence is North America, which includes the
United States, Canada, and to some extent in some product markets, Mexico. Canada and the United States share history, language, and much of their culture, and both are members of the new USMCA agreement negotiated by the Trump administration. Mexico is clearly different in many regards, but its proximity to the United States, along with its membership in USMCA, implies that for some product markets (e.g., automobiles) it might be reasonable to consider it part of a relatively homogenous regional market. In the Latin America region, shared Spanish history, cultural heri-tage, and language (with the exception of Brazil, which was colonized by the Portu-guese) mean that national differences are somewhat moderated. One can argue that Greater China, which includes the city-states of Hong Kong and Singapore, along with Taiwan, is a coherent region, as is much of the Middle East, where a strong Arab culture and shared history may limit national differences. Similarly, Russia and some former states of the Soviet Union, such as Belarus and Ukraine, might be considered part of a larger regional market, at least for some products. 
Taking a regional perspective is important because it may suggest that localization at the regional rather than the national level is the appropriate strategic response. For exam-ple, rather than produce cars for each national market within Europe or North America, it makes far more sense for car manufacturers to build cars for the European or North American regions. The ability to standardize a product offering within a region allows for the attainment of greater scale economies, and hence lower costs, than if each nation required its own offering. At the same time, one should be careful to not push this perspec-tive too far. There are still deep, profound, cultural differences between the United King-dom, France, Germany, and Italy—all members of the EU—which may require some degree of local customization at the national level. Managers must thus make a judgment call about the appropriate level of aggregation given (1) the product market they are look-ing at and (2) the nature of national differences and trends for regional convergence. What might make sense for automobiles might not be appropriate for packaged food products.

8-6 Choosing a Global Strategy
Pressures for local responsiveness imply that it may not be possible for a firm to real-ize the full benefits from economies of scale and location economies. It may not be possible to serve the global marketplace from a single, low-cost location, producing a globally standardized product, and marketing it worldwide to achieve economies of scale. In practice, the need to customize the product offering to local conditions may work against the implementation of such a strategy. For example, automobile firms have found that Japanese, American, and European consumers demand differ-ent kinds of cars, and this necessitates producing products that are customized for local markets (although using common global platforms—see the Opening Case). In response, firms such as Honda, Ford, and Toyota are pursuing a strategy of estab-lishing top-to-bottom design and production facilities in each region so that they can better serve local demands. Although such customization brings benefits, it also limits the ability of a firm to realize significant scale economies and location economies. 
In addition, pressures for local responsiveness imply that it may not be possible to leverage skills and products associated with a firm’s distinctive competencies whole-sale from one nation to another. Concessions often must be made to local conditions. Despite being depicted as “poster child” for the proliferation of standardized, global products, even McDonald’s has found that it must customize its product offerings (its menu) in order to account for national differences in tastes and preferences. 
Given the need to balance the cost and differentiation (value) sides of a company’s business model, how do differences in the strength of pressures for cost reductions versus those for local responsiveness affect the choice of a company’s strategy? Com-panies typically choose among four main strategic postures when competing inter-nationally: a global standardization strategy, a localization strategy, a transnational strategy, and an international strategy. 
The appropriateness of each strategy varies with the extent of pressures for cost reductions and local responsiveness. Figure 8.3 illustrates the conditions under which each strategy is most appropriate. 

8-6a Global Standardization Strategy
Companies that pursue a global standardization strategy focus on increasing profit-ability by reaping the cost reductions that come from economies of scale and location economies; that is, they pursue a low-cost strategy on a global scale. The production, marketing, and R&D activities of companies pursuing a global strategy are concen-trated in a few favorable locations. These companies try not to customize their prod-uct offerings and marketing strategy to local conditions because customization, which involves shorter production runs and the duplication of functions, can raise costs. Instead, they prefer to market a standardized product worldwide so that they can reap the maximum benefits from economies of scale. They also tend to use their cost advantage to support aggressive pricing in world markets. 



	A global standardization strategy makes obvious sense when there are strong
pressures for cost reductions and when demands for local responsiveness are mini-mal. Increasingly, these conditions prevail in many industrial goods industries, whose products often serve universal needs. In the semiconductor industry, for example, global standards have emerged, creating enormous demands for standardized global products. However, these conditions are not always found in many consumer goods markets, where demands for local responsiveness remain high. The strategy is inappro-priate when demands for local responsiveness can remain high. 
It is important to note that while a global standardization strategy helps to lower costs, the firm may not present itself as a low-cost competitor to its customers. Indeed, it may also do certain things that raise its costs in pursuit of superior brand equity. As we saw in the Opening Case, Emirates Airline based in Dubai is essentially pursuing a global stan-dardization strategy, offering only long-haul service through its Dubai hub. While this strategy helps to fill its planes and lower costs, the airline also overlays this with superior inflight customer service, which has created an image of quality and a superior global brand. What the management of Emirates realized is that long-haul international travelers have the same basic needs wherever they come from; they desire an efficient, affordable, comfortable flight with high-quality preflight and inflight service to make the experience of spending 4 to 18 hours in an aircraft as pleasant as possible. Emirates has built a global brand around these attributes. While this raises some costs (in-flight quality can be expen-sive to provide), it also helps to drive demand, fill its aircraft, and lower operating costs per mile. So long as the cost reduction from filling its aircraft outweigh the additional costs of providing superior customer service, such a strategy can boost revenues and profits. 

8-6b Localization Strategy
A localization strategy focuses on increasing profitability by customizing the compa-ny’s goods or services so that they provide a favorable match to tastes and preferences in different national or regional markets. Localization is most appropriate when there are substantial differences across nations or regions regarding consumer tastes and prefer-ences, and where cost pressures are not too intense. By customizing the product offering to local demands, the company increases the value of that product in the local market. On the downside, because it involves some duplication of functions and smaller production runs, customization limits the ability of the company to capture the cost reductions asso-ciated with mass-producing a standardized product for global consumption. The strategy may make sense, however, if the added value associated with local customization supports higher pricing—which would enable the company to recoup its higher costs—or if it leads to substantially greater local demand, enabling the company to reduce costs through the attainment of scale economies in the local market. 
MTV is a good example of a company that has had to pursue a localization strat-egy. MTV localizes its programming to match the demands of viewers in different nations. For example, in India it has a program based on the popular sport of cricket, a game that few in the United States understand. If MTV hadn’t done this, it would have lost market share to local competitors, its advertising revenues would have fallen, and its profitability would have declined. Thus, even though it raised costs, localiza-tion became a strategic imperative at MTV. 
At the same time, it is important to realize that companies like MTV still must closely monitor costs. Companies pursuing a localization strategy need to be efficient and, when-ever possible, capture scale economies from their global reach. As noted earlier, many automobile companies have found that they have to customize some of their product offerings to local market demands—for example, by producing large pickup trucks for U.S. consumers and small, fuel-efficient cars for European and Japanese consumers. At the same time, these companies try to achieve scale economies from their global volume by using common vehicle platforms and components across many different models and by manufacturing those platforms and components at efficiently scaled factories that are optimally located. By designing their products in this way, these companies have localized their product offerings and simultaneously capture some scale economies.

8-6c Transnational Strategy
We have argued that a global standardization strategy makes most sense when cost pressures are intense and demands for local responsiveness limited. Conversely, a local-ization strategy makes most sense when demands for local responsiveness are high, but cost pressures are moderate or low. What happens, however, when the company simultaneously faces both strong cost pressures and strong pressures for local respon-siveness? How can managers balance out such competing and inconsistent demands? According to some researchers, pursuing a transnational strategy is the answer. 
Two of these researchers, Christopher Bartlett and Sumantra Ghoshal, argue that,
in today’s global environment, competitive conditions are so intense that, to survive, companies must do all they can to respond to pressures for both cost reductions and local responsiveness. They must try to realize location economies and economies of scale from global volume, transfer distinctive competencies and skills within the com-pany, and simultaneously pay attention to pressures for local responsiveness. 
Moreover, Bartlett and Ghoshal note that, in the modern, multinational enterprise, valuable competencies and resources do not reside just in the home country but can develop in any of the company’s worldwide operations. Thus, they maintain that the flow of skills and product offerings should not be all one way, from home company to foreign subsidiary. Rather, the flow should also be from foreign subsidiary to home country, and from foreign subsidiary to foreign subsidiary. Transnational companies, in other words, must focus on leveraging subsidiary skills. 
In essence, companies that pursue a transnational strategy are trying to develop a strategy that simultaneously achieves low costs, differentiates the product offering across geographic markets, and fosters a flow of resources such as process knowledge between different subsidiaries in the company’s global network of operations. As attractive as this may sound, the strategy is not easy to pursue because it places conflicting demands on the company. Differentiating the product to respond to local demands in different geographic markets raises costs, which runs counter to the goal of reducing costs. Companies such as 3M and ABB (a Swiss-based multinational engineering conglomerate) have tried to imple-ment a transnational strategy and found it difficult. 
Indeed, how best to implement a transnational strategy is one of the most complex questions that large, global companies grapple with today. It may be that few, if any, companies have perfected this strategic posture. But some clues to the right approach can be derived from a number of companies. Consider, for example, the case of Cat-erpillar. The need to compete with low-cost competitors such as Komatsu of Japan forced Caterpillar to look for greater cost economies. However, variations in construc-tion practices and government regulations across countries meant that Caterpillar also had to be responsive to local demands. Therefore, it confronted significant pressures for cost reductions and for local responsiveness. 
To deal with cost pressures, Caterpillar redesigned its products to use many identical components and invested in a few large-scale, component-manufacturing facilities, sited at favorable locations, to fill global demand and realize scale economies. At the same time, the company augments the centralized manufacturing of components with assembly plants in each of its major global markets. At these plants, Caterpillar adds local product features, tailoring the finished product to local needs. Thus, Caterpillar realizes many of the benefits of global manufacturing while reacting to pressures for local responsiveness by differen-tiating its product among national markets. Caterpillar started to pursue this strategy in the 1980s. By the 2000s, it had succeeded in doubling output per employee, significantly reducing its overall cost structure in the process. Meanwhile, Komatsu and Hitachi, which are still wedded to a Japan-centric global strategy, have seen their cost advantages evapo-rate and have been steadily losing market share to Caterpillar. 
However, building an organization capable of supporting a transnational strategy is a complex, challenging task. Indeed, some would say it is too complex because the strategy implementation problems of creating a viable organizational structure and set of control systems to manage this strategy are immense. We return to this issue in Chapter 12. 

8-6d International Strategy
Sometimes it is possible to identify multinational companies that find themselves in the fortunate position of being confronted with low-cost pressures and low pressures for local responsiveness. Typically, these enterprises sell a product that serves universal needs, but because they do not face significant competitors, they are not confronted with pressures to reduce their cost structure. Xerox found itself in this position in the 1960s, after its inven-tion and commercialization of the photocopier. Strong patents protected the technology comprising the photocopier, so for several years Xerox did not face competitors—it had a monopoly. Because the product was highly valued in most developed nations, Xerox was able to sell the same basic product all over the world and charge a relatively high price for it. At the same time, because it did not face direct competitors, the company did not have to deal with strong pressures to minimize its costs. 
Historically, companies like Xerox have followed a similar pattern as they developed their international operations. They tend to centralize product development functions such as R&D at home. However, companies also tend to establish manufacturing and marketing functions in each major country or geographic region in which they do business. Although they may undertake some local customization of product offering and mar-keting strategy, this tends to be rather limited in scope. Ultimately, in most international companies, the head office retains tight control over marketing and product strategy.
Other companies that have pursued this strategy include P&G, which had histor-ically always developed innovative new products in Cincinnati and thereafter trans-ferred them wholesale to local markets. Microsoft has followed a similar strategy. The bulk of Microsoft’s product development work takes place in Redmond, Washington, where the company is headquartered. Although some localization work is undertaken elsewhere, it is limited to producing foreign-language versions of popular Microsoft programs such as Office 365. 

8-6e Changes in Strategy over Time
The Achilles heel of the international strategy is that, over time, competitors inev-itably emerge, and if managers do not take proactive steps to reduce their cost structure, their company may be rapidly outflanked by efficient, global competi-tors. This is exactly what happened to Xerox. Japanese companies such as Canon ultimately invented their way around Xerox’s patents, produced their own pho-tocopying equipment in very efficient manufacturing plants, priced the machines below Xerox’s products, and rapidly took global market share from Xerox. Xerox’s demise was not due to the emergence of competitors, for ultimately that was bound to occur, but rather to its failure to proactively reduce its cost structure in advance of the emergence of competitors. The message here is that an international strat-egy may not be viable in the long term, and to survive, companies that are able to pursue it need to shift toward a global standardization strategy, or perhaps a trans-national strategy, ahead of competitors (see Figure 8.4). 



The same can be said about a localization strategy. Localization may give a com-pany a competitive edge, but if it is simultaneously facing aggressive competitors, the company will also need to reduce its cost structure—and the only way to do that may be to adopt a transnational strategy. Thus, as competition intensifies, international and localization strategies tend to become less viable, and managers need to orientate their companies toward either a global standardization strategy or a transnational strategy. 

8-7 The Choice of Entry Mode
Any firm contemplating entering a different national market must determine the best mode or vehicle for such entry. There are five primary choices of entry mode: export-ing, licensing, franchising, entering into a joint venture with a host-country company, and setting up a wholly owned subsidiary in the host country. Each mode has advan-tages and disadvantages, and managers must weigh these carefully when deciding which mode to use. 

8-7a Exporting
Most manufacturing companies begin their global expansion as exporters and only later switch to one of the other modes for serving a foreign market. Exporting has two distinct advantages: It avoids the costs of establishing manufacturing operations in the host country, which are often substantial, and it may be consistent with scale econo-mies and location economies. By manufacturing the product in a centralized location and then exporting it to other national markets, a company may be able to realize substantial scale economies from its global sales volume. That is how many Japanese auto companies originally made inroads into the U.S. auto market, and how Samsung gained share in the market for computer memory chips. 
There are several drawbacks to exporting. First, exporting from the company’s home base may not be appropriate if there are lower-cost locations for manufacturing the product abroad (that is, if the company can achieve location economies by moving production elsewhere). Thus, particularly in the case of a company pursuing a global standardization or transnational strategy, it may pay to manufacture in a location where conditions are most favorable from a value creation perspective and then export from that location to the rest of the globe. This is not so much an argument against exporting as it is an argument against exporting from the company’s home country. For example, many U.S. electronics companies have moved some manufacturing to Asia because low-cost but highly skilled labor is available there. They export from Asia to the rest of the globe, including the United States (as Apple does with the iPhone). 
Another drawback is that high transport costs can make exporting uneconomi-cal, particularly in the case of bulk products. One way of alleviating this problem is to manufacture bulk products on a regional basis, thereby realizing some economies from large-scale production while limiting transport costs. Many multinational chem-ical companies manufacture their products on a regional basis, serving several coun-tries in a region from one facility. 
A third drawback is that tariff barriers can make exporting uneconomical. Sim-ilarly, the threat of tariff barriers by the host-country government can make it very risky. In the world we now live in, many countries are becoming more and more nation-alistic, which means that they are increasing trade barriers (e.g., the United States) or renegotiating their partnerships (e.g., the United Kingdom). The largely unknown standing of international trade barriers in some countries—due to nationalistic, polit-ical strategies—can be a detriment to exporting across country borders. 
Finally, a common practice among companies that are just beginning to export also poses risks. A company may delegate marketing activities in each country in which it does business to a local agent, but there is no guarantee that the agent will act in the company’s best interest. Often, foreign agents also carry the products of competing companies and thus have divided loyalties. Consequently, agents may not perform as well as the company would if it managed marketing itself. One way to solve this problem is to set up a wholly owned subsidiary in the host country to handle local marketing. In this way, the company can reap the cost advantages that arise from man-ufacturing the product in a single location and exercise tight control over marketing strategy in the host country.

8-7b Licensing
International licensing is an arrangement whereby a foreign licensee purchases the rights to produce a company’s product in the licensee’s country for a negotiated fee (normally, royalty payments on the number of units sold). The licensee then provides most of the capital necessary to open the overseas operation. The advantage of licensing is that the company does not have to bear the development costs and risks associated with opening up a foreign market. Licensing therefore can be a very attrac-tive option for companies that lack the capital to develop operations overseas. It can also be an attractive option for companies that are unwilling to commit substantial financial resources to an unfamiliar or politically volatile foreign market where politi-cal risks are particularly high. 
Licensing has some serious drawbacks, however. First, it does not give a com-pany the tight control over manufacturing, marketing, and strategic functions in foreign countries that it needs to have in order to realize scale economies and loca-tion economies—as companies pursuing both global standardization and transnational strategies try to do. Typically, each licensee sets up its manufacturing operations. Hence, the company stands little chance of realizing scale economies and location economies by manufacturing its product in a centralized location. When these economies are likely to be important, licensing may not be the best way of expanding overseas. 
Second, competing in a global marketplace may make it necessary for a company to coordinate strategic moves across countries so that the profits earned in one country can be used to support competitive attacks in another. Licensing, by its very nature, severely limits a company’s ability to coordinate strategy in this way. A licensee is unlikely to let a multinational company take its profits (beyond those due in the form of royalty payments) and use them to support an entirely different licensee operating in another country. 
Third, there is risk associated with licensing technological know-how to foreign companies. For many multinational companies, technological know-how forms the basis of their competitive advantage, and they want to maintain control over how this competitive advantage is put to use. By licensing its technology, a company can quickly lose control over it. RCA, for instance, once licensed its color television technology to a number of Japanese companies. The Japanese companies quickly assimilated RCA’s technology and then used it to enter the U.S. market, where they soon gained a larger share of the U.S. market than the RCA brand holds. 
There are ways of reducing this risk. One way is by entering into a cross-licensing agreement with a foreign firm. Under a cross-licensing agreement, a firm might license some valuable, intangible property to a foreign partner and, in addition to a royalty payment, also request that the foreign partner license some of its valuable know-how to the firm. Such agreements are reckoned to reduce the risks associated with licens-ing technological know-how, as the licensee realizes that if it violates the spirit of a licensing contract (by using the knowledge obtained to compete directly with the licensor), the licensor can do the same to it. Put differently, cross-licensing agreements enable firms to hold each other hostage, thereby reducing the probability that they will behave opportunistically toward each other. Such cross-licensing agreements are increasingly common in high-technology industries. For example, the U.S. biotech-nology firm Amgen licensed one of its key drugs, Neupogen, to Kirin, the Japanese pharmaceutical company. The license gives Kirin the right to sell Neupogen in Japan. In return, Amgen receives a royalty payment, and through a licensing agreement it gains the right to sell certain Kirin products in the United States. 
Finally, a licensee can degrade or damage the brand of the company that it is licensing from if it pursues strategies that are not in the best interests of the licensee. For example, the luxury apparel company Burberry licensed Sanyo Shokai of Japan to sell its branded products in Japan. However, Sanyo Shokai ultimately started to damage Burberry’s global brand by charging a much lower price for Burberry branded products in Japan than elsewhere in the world (see Strategy in Action 8.2 for details). Burberry responded to the “Japan problem” by terminating its licensing arrangement with Sanyo Shokai in 2015 and setting up its own wholly owned stores in the country.

8-7c Franchising
In many respects, franchising is similar to licensing, although franchising tends to involve longer-term commitments than licensing. Franchising is basically a special-ized form of licensing in which the franchiser not only sells intangible property to the franchisee (normally a trademark), but also insists that the franchisee abide by strict rules governing how it does business. They normally provide training, operating systems, marketing support, and require franchisees to use specific vendors. The fran-chiser will often assist the franchisee to run the business on an ongoing basis. As with licensing, the franchiser typically receives a royalty payment, which amounts to a per-centage of the franchisee revenues. Depending on the franchise, there are additional fees such as marketing or a monthly percentage of sales. 
Whereas licensing is a strategy pursued primarily by manufacturing companies, franchising, which resembles it in some respects, is a strategy employed chiefly by ser-vice companies. McDonald’s provides a good example of a firm that has grown by using a franchising strategy. McDonald’s has set down strict rules as to how franchi-sees should operate a restaurant. These rules extend to controlling the menu, cooking methods, staffing policies, and restaurant design and location. McDonald’s also orga-nizes the supply chain for its franchisees and provides management training. 
The advantages of franchising are similar to those of licensing. Specifically, the franchiser does not need to bear the development costs and risks associated with open-ing up a foreign market on its own, for the franchisee typically assumes those costs and risks. Thus, using a franchising strategy, a service company can build up a global presence quickly and at a low cost. 
The disadvantages of franchising are less pronounced than in licensing. Because service companies often use franchising, there is no reason to consider the need for coordination of manufacturing to achieve experience curve and location economies. But franchising may inhibit the firm’s ability to take profits out of one country to sup-port competitive attacks in another. A more significant disadvantage of franchising is quality control. The foundation of franchising arrangements is that the firm’s brand name conveys a message to consumers about the quality of the firm’s product. Thus, a business traveler checking in at a Four Seasons hotel in Hong Kong can reasonably expect the same quality of room, food, and service that would be received in New York, Hawai’I, or Ontario, Canada. The Four Seasons name is assumed to guarantee consistent product quality. This presents a problem in that foreign franchisees may not be as concerned about quality as they are supposed to be, and the result of poor quality can cascade beyond lost sales in a particular foreign market to a decline in the firm’s worldwide reputation. For example, if a business traveler has a bad experience at the Four Seasons in Hong Kong, he or she may never go to another Four Seasons hotel, and may urge colleagues to avoid the chain as well. The geographical distance of the firm from its foreign franchisees can make poor quality difficult to detect. In addi-tion, the numbers of franchisees—in the case of McDonald’s, tens of thousands—can make quality control difficult. 
To reduce these problems, a company can set up a subsidiary in each country or region in which it is expanding. The subsidiary, which might be wholly owned by the company or a joint venture with a foreign company, then assumes the rights and obliga-tions to establish franchisees throughout that particular country or region. The combi-nation of proximity and the limited number of independent franchisees that need to be monitored reduces the quality control problem. Because the subsidiary is at least partly owned by the company, it can place its own managers in the subsidiary to ensure the level of quality monitoring it demands. This organizational arrangement has proved very popular in practice; it has been used by McDonald’s, KFC, and Hilton Worldwide to expand international operations, to name just three examples. 

8-7d Joint Ventures
Establishing a joint venture with a foreign company has long been a favored mode for entering a new market. The most typical form of joint venture is a 50/50 joint venture, in which each party takes a 50% ownership stake and a team of managers from both parent companies shares operating control. Some companies seek joint ventures wherein they become the majority shareholder (for example, a 51 to 49% ownership split), which permits tighter control by the dominant partner. 
Joint ventures have several advantages. First, a company may feel that it can benefit from a local partner’s knowledge of a host country’s competitive conditions, culture, language, political systems, and business systems. Second, when the development costs and risks of opening up a foreign market are high, a company might gain by sharing these costs and risks with a local partner. Third, in some countries, political consid-erations make joint ventures the only feasible entry mode. For example, historically, many U.S. companies found it much easier to obtain permission to set up operations in Japan if they joined with a Japanese partner than if they tried to enter on their own. The same has been true in China. 
Despite the advantages, there are major disadvantages with joint ventures. First, as with licensing, a firm that enters into a joint venture may risk yielding control of its technology to its partner. Thus, a proposed joint venture in 2002 between Boeing and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries to build Boeing’s wide-body jet (the 787) raised fears that Boeing might unwittingly give its commercial airline technology to the Japanese. However, joint-venture agreements can be constructed to minimize this risk. One option is to hold majority ownership in the venture. This allows the dominant partner to exercise great con-trol over its technology—but it can be difficult to find a foreign partner who is willing to settle for minority ownership. Another option is to “wall off” from a partner technology that is central to the core competence of the firm while sharing other technology. 
A second disadvantage is that a joint venture does not give a firm the tight con-trol over subsidiaries that it might need to realize experience-curve or location econ-omies. Nor does it give a firm the control over a foreign subsidiary it might need for engaging in coordinated, global attacks against its rivals. Consider the entry of Texas Instruments (TI) into the Japanese semiconductor market. When TI established semiconductor facilities in Japan, it did so for the dual purpose of checking Japanese manufacturers’ market share and limiting the cash they had available for invading TI’s global market. In other words, TI was engaging in global strategic coordination. To implement this strategy, TI’s subsidiary in Japan had to be prepared to take instruc-tions from corporate headquarters regarding competitive strategy. The strategy also required the Japanese subsidiary to run at a loss if necessary. Few, if any, potential joint-venture partners would have been willing to accept such conditions, as it would have necessitated a willingness to accept a negative return on investment. Indeed, many joint ventures establish a degree of autonomy that would make such direct con-trol over strategic decisions all but impossible to establish. Thus, to implement this strategy, TI set up a wholly owned subsidiary in Japan.

8-7e Wholly Owned Subsidiaries
A wholly owned subsidiary is one in which the parent company owns 100% of the sub-sidiary’s stock. To establish a wholly owned subsidiary in a foreign market, a company can either set up a completely new operation in that country or acquire an established host-country company to promote its products in the host market. 
Setting up a wholly owned subsidiary offers three advantages. First, when a com-pany’s competitive advantage is based on its control of a technological competency, a wholly owned subsidiary will normally be the preferred entry mode because it reduces the company’s risk of losing this control. Consequently, many high-tech companies prefer wholly owned subsidiaries to joint ventures or licensing arrangements. Wholly owned subsidiaries tend to be the favored entry mode in the semiconductor, computer, electronics, and pharmaceutical industries. 
Second, a wholly owned subsidiary gives a company the kind of tight control over
operations in different countries that it needs if it is going to engage in global strate-gic coordination—taking profits from one country to support competitive attacks in another. 
Third, a wholly owned subsidiary may be the best choice if a company wants to realize location economies and the scale economies that flow from producing a stan-dardized output from a single or limited number of manufacturing plants. When pres-sures on costs are intense, it may pay a company to configure its value chain in such a way that value added at each stage is maximized. Thus, a national subsidiary may specialize in manufacturing only part of the product line, or certain components of the end product, exchanging parts and products with other subsidiaries in the com-pany’s global system. Establishing such a global production system requires a high degree of control over the operations of national affiliates. Different national opera-tions must be prepared to accept centrally determined decisions as to how they should produce, how much they should produce, and how their output should be priced for transfer between operations. A wholly owned subsidiary would have to comply with these mandates, whereas licensees or joint-venture partners would most likely shun such a subservient role. 
On the other hand, establishing a wholly-owned subsidiary is generally the costli-est method of serving a foreign market. The parent company must bear all the costs and risks of setting up overseas operations—in contrast to joint ventures, where the costs and risks are shared, or licensing, where the licensee bears most of the costs and risks. But the risks of learning to do business in a new culture diminish if a company acquires an established host-country enterprise. Acquisitions, however, raise a set of additional problems, such as trying to marry divergent corporate cultures, and these may more than offset the benefits. (The problems associated with acquisitions are dis-cussed in Chapter 10.) 

8-7f Pros and Cons of Entry Modes
The advantages and disadvantages of the various entry modes are summarized in Table 8.1. Inevitably, there are trade-offs in choosing one entry mode over another. For example, when considering entry into an unfamiliar country with a track record of nationalizing foreign-owned enterprises, a company might favor a joint venture with a local enterprise. Its rationale might be that the local partner will help it establish oper-ations in an unfamiliar environment and speak out against nationalization should the possibility arise. But if the company’s distinctive competency is based on proprietary technology, entering into a joint venture might mean risking loss of control over that technology to the joint venture partner, which would make this strategy unattractive. Despite such hazards, some generalizations can be offered about the optimal choice of entry mode. 

Distinctive Competencies and Entry Mode – When companies expand internationally to earn greater returns from their differentiated product offerings, entering markets where indigenous competitors lack comparable products, the companies are pursu-ing an international strategy. The optimal entry mode for such companies depends to some degree upon the nature of their distinctive competency. In particular, we need to distinguish between companies with a distinctive competency in technological know-how and those with a distinctive competency in management know-how. 
If a company’s competitive advantage—its distinctive competency—derives from its control of proprietary technological know-how (i.e., intellectual property), licens-ing and joint-venture arrangements should be avoided, if possible, to minimize the risk of losing control of that technology. Thus, if a high-tech company is considering setting up operations in a foreign country in order to profit from a distinctive compe-tency in technological know-how, it should probably do so through a wholly owned subsidiary. 
However, this should not be viewed as a hard-and-fast rule. For instance, a licens-ing or joint-venture arrangement might be structured in such a way as to reduce the risks that licensees or joint-venture partners will expropriate a company’s technologi-cal know-how. (We consider this kind of arrangement in more detail later in the chap-ter when we discuss the issue of structuring strategic alliances.) Or consider a situation where a company believes its technological advantage will be short lived and expects rapid imitation of its core technology by competitors. In this situation, the company might want to license its technology as quickly as possible to foreign companies in order to gain global acceptance of its technology before imitation occurs. Such a strategy has some advantages. By licensing its technology to competitors, the company may deter them from developing their own, possibly superior, technology. It also may be able to establish its technology as the dominant design in the industry, ensuring a steady stream of royalty payments. Such situations aside, however, the attractions of licensing are probably outweighed by the risks of losing control of technology, and therefore licensing should be avoided. 
The competitive advantage of many service companies such as McDonald’s or Hilton Worldwide is based on management know-how (i.e., process knowledge). For such com-panies, the risk of losing control of their management skills to franchisees or joint-venture partners is not that great. The reason is that the valuable asset of such companies is their brand name, and brand names are generally well protected by intellectual property laws pertaining to trademarks. Given this fact, many issues that arise in the case of technolog-ical know-how do not arise in the case of management know-how. As a result, many ser-vice companies favor a combination of franchising and subsidiaries to control franchisees within a particular country or region. The subsidiary may be wholly owned or a joint venture. In most cases, however, service companies have found that entering into a joint venture with a local partner in order to set up a controlling subsidiary in a country or region works best because a joint venture is often politically more acceptable and brings a degree of local knowledge to the subsidiary. 

Pressures for Cost Reduction and Entry Mode – The greater the pressures for cost re-ductions, the more likely that a company will want to pursue some combination of exporting and wholly owned subsidiaries. By manufacturing in the locations where factor conditions are optimal and then exporting to the rest of the world, a company may be able to realize substantial location economies and substantial scale economies. The company might then want to export the finished product to marketing subsid-iaries based in various countries. Typically, these subsidiaries would be wholly owned and have the responsibility for overseeing distribution in a particular country. Setting up wholly owned marketing subsidiaries is preferable to a joint-venture arrangement or using a foreign marketing agent because it gives the company the tight control over marketing that might be required to coordinate a globally dispersed value chain. In addition, tight control over a local operation enables the company to use the prof-its generated in one market to improve its competitive position in another market. Hence companies pursuing global or transnational strategies prefer to establish wholly owned subsidiaries.

8-8 Global Strategic Alliances
Global strategic alliances are cooperative agreements between companies from differ-ent countries that are actual or potential competitors. Strategic alliances range from formal joint ventures in which two or more companies have an equity stake, to short-term contractual agreements in which two companies may agree to cooperate on a particular problem (such as developing a new product).

8-8a Advantages of Strategic Alliances
Companies enter into strategic alliances with competitors to achieve a number of strategic objectives. First, strategic alliances may facilitate entry into a foreign market. For exam-ple, many firms feel that if they are to successfully enter the Chinese market, they need a local partner who understands business conditions and has good connections. Thus, Warner Brothers entered into a joint venture with two Chinese partners to produce and distribute films in China. As a foreign film company, Warner found that if it wanted to produce films on its own for the Chinese market, it had to go through a complex approval process for every film. It also had to farm out distribution to a local company, which made doing business in China very difficult. Due to the participation of Chinese firms, however, the joint-venture films will merit a streamlined approval process, and the venture can distribute any films it produces. Moreover, the joint venture is able to produce films for Chinese TV, something that foreign firms are not allowed to do. 
Second, strategic alliances allow firms to share the fixed costs (and associated risks) of developing new products or processes. An alliance between Boeing and a number of Japanese companies to build Boeing’s latest commercial jetliner, the 787, was motivated by Boeing’s desire to share the estimated $8-billion investment required to develop the aircraft. 
Third, an alliance is a way to bring together complementary skills and assets that neither company could easily develop on its own. In 2011, for example, Microsoft and Nokia established an alliance aimed at developing and marketing smartphones that used Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system. Microsoft contributed its soft-ware engineering skills, particularly with regard to the development of a version of its Windows operating system for smartphones, and Nokia contributed its design, engi-neering, and marketing know-how. The first phones resulting from this collaboration reached the market in late 2012. Microsoft subsequently purchased Nokia’s mobile phone business in 2013. 
Fourth, it can make sense to form an alliance that will help firms establish techno-logical standards for the industry that will benefit them. This was also a goal of the alliance between Microsoft and Nokia. The idea was to establish Windows 8 as the de facto operating system for smartphones in the face of strong competition from Apple, with its iPhone, and Google, whose Android operating system was the most widely used smartphone operating system in the world in 2012. Unfortunately for Microsoft, the Nokia Windows phone failed to gain sufficient market share, primarily because by the time the phone reached the market, the iPhone and Android phones already dom-inated the market and consumers did not want to switch to a new offering. 

8-8b Disadvantages of Strategic Alliances
The advantages we have discussed can be very significant. Despite this, some com-mentators have criticized strategic alliances on the grounds that they give competitors a low-cost route to new technology and markets. For example, some commentators
argued that many strategic alliances between U.S. and Japanese firms were part of an implicit Japanese strategy to keep high-paying, high-value-added jobs in Japan while gaining the project engineering and production process skills that underlie the com-petitive success of many U.S. companies. They argued that Japanese success in the
machine tool and semiconductor industries was built on U.S. technology acquired through strategic alliances. And they argued that U.S. managers were aiding the Japanese by entering alliances that channel new inventions to Japan and provide a U.S. sales and distribution network for the resulting products. Although such deals may generate short-term profits, the argument goes, in the long term, the result is to “hollow out” U.S. firms, leaving them with no competitive advantage in the global marketplace. The same point could be made about many alliances between Western companies and Chinese enterprises. 
These critics have a point; alliances have risks. Unless a firm is careful, it can give away more than it receives. But there are so many examples of apparently successful alliances between firms—including alliances between U.S. and Japanese firms—that this position appears extreme. It is difficult to see how the Boeing–Mitsubishi alliance for the 787, or the long-term Fuji–Xerox alliance, fit the critics’ thesis. In these cases, both partners seem to have gained from the alliance. Why do some alliances benefit both firms, while others benefit one firm and hurt the other? The next section provides an answer to this question. 

8-8c Making Strategic Alliances Work
The failure rate for international strategic alliances is quite high. For example, one study of 49 international strategic alliances found that two-thirds run into serious managerial and financial troubles within 2 years of their formation, and that although many of these problems are ultimately solved, 33% are rated as failures by the parties involved. The success of an alliance seems to be a function of three main factors: partner selection, alliance structure, and the manner in which the alliance is managed.

Partner Selection – One key to making a strategic alliance work is selecting the right partner. A good partner has three principal characteristics. First, a good partner helps the company accomplish strategic goals such as achieving market access, sharing the costs and risks of new-product development, or gaining access to critical core compe-tencies. In other words, the partner must have capabilities that the company lacks and that it values. Second, a good partner shares the firm’s vision for the purpose of the alliance. If two companies approach an alliance with radically different agendas, the chances are great that the relationship will not be harmonious, and the partnership will end. 
Third, a good partner is unlikely to try to exploit the alliance for its own ends—that is, to expropriate the company’s technological know-how while giving away little in return. In this respect, firms with reputations for fair play probably make the best partners. For example, IBM is involved in so many strategic alliances that it would not pay for the company to trample over its individual alliance partners. This would tarnish IBM’s reputation of being a good ally and would make it more difficult for it to attract alliance partners. Because IBM attaches great importance to its alliances, it is unlikely to engage in the kind of opportunistic behavior that critics highlight. Similarly, their reputations make it less likely (but by no means impossible) that such Japanese firms as Sony, Toshiba, and Fuji, which have histories of alliances with non-Japanese firms, would exploit an alliance partner. 
To select a partner with these three characteristics, a company needs to conduct comprehensive research on potential alliance candidates. To increase the probability of selecting a good partner, the company should collect as much pertinent, publicly available information about potential allies as possible; collect data from informed third parties, including companies that have had alliances with the potential partners, investment bankers who have had dealings with them, and former employees; and get to know potential partners as well as possible before committing to an alliance. This last step should include face-to-face meetings between senior managers (and perhaps middle-level managers) to ensure that the chemistry is right.

Alliance Structure – Having selected a partner, the alliance should be structured so that the company’s risk of giving too much away to the partner is reduced to an accept-able level. First, alliances can be designed to make it difficult (if not impossible) to transfer technology not meant to be transferred. Specifically, the design, development, manufacture, and service of a product manufactured by an alliance can be structured to “wall off” sensitive technologies to prevent their leakage to the other participant. In the alliance between General Electric and Snecma to build commercial aircraft engines (now known as Safran), for example, GE reduced the risk of “excess transfer” by walling off certain steps of the production process. The modularization effectively cut off the transfer of what GE regarded as key competitive technology while permit-ting Snecma access to final assembly. First established in the 1970s, this alliance has proved to be remarkably enduring and is still operating today. Similarly, in the alliance between Boeing and the Japanese to build the 787, Boeing walled off research, design, and marketing functions considered central to its competitive position, while allowing the Japanese to share in production technology. Boeing also walled off new technolo-gies not required for 787 production. 
Second, contractual safeguards can be written into an alliance agreement to guard against the risk of opportunism by a partner. For example, the auto parts supplier TRW had three strategic alliances with large Japanese auto component suppliers to produce seat belts, engine valves, and steering gears for sale to Japanese-owned auto assembly plants in the United States. TRW had clauses in every alliance contract that barred the Japanese firms from competing with TRW to supply U.S.-owned auto com-panies with component parts. TRW thus protected itself against the possibility that the Japanese companies were entering into the alliances merely as a means of gaining access to the North American market to compete with TRW in its home market. 
Third, both parties in an alliance can agree in advance to exchange skills and tech-nologies that the other covets, thereby ensuring a chance for equitable gain. Cross-licensing agreements are one way to achieve this goal. 
Fourth, the risk of opportunism by an alliance partner can be reduced if the firm extracts a significant, credible commitment from its partner in advance. A nearly 60-year alliance between Xerox and Fuji to build photocopiers for the Asian market perhaps best illustrates this. Rather than enter into an informal agreement or a licens-ing arrangement (which Fujifilm initially preferred), Xerox insisted that Fuji invest in a 50/50 joint venture to serve Japan and East Asia. This venture constituted such a sig-nificant investment in people, equipment, and facilities that Fujifilm was committed from the outset to making the alliance work in order to earn a return on its investment. By agreeing to the joint venture, Fuji essentially made a credible commitment to the alliance. In turn, Xerox felt secure in transferring its photocopier technology to Fuji. The alliance was widely regarded as very successful and endured until 2021. 

Managing the Alliance – Once a partner has been selected and an appropriate alliance structure agreed upon, the task facing the company is to maximize benefits from the alliance. One important ingredient of success appears to be sensitivity to cultural dif-ferences. Many variations in management style are attributable to cultural differences, and managers need to make allowances for these when dealing with their partners. Beyond this, maximizing benefits from an alliance seems to involve building trust be-tween partners and learning from partners. 
Managing an alliance successfully requires building interpersonal relationships between the firms’ managers, or what is sometimes referred to as relational capital.36 This is one lesson that can be drawn from the strategic alliance between Ford and Mazda, which lasted from 1974 until 2015. Ford and Mazda set up a framework of meetings within which their managers not only discuss matters pertaining to the alli-ance, but also have time to get to know one another. The belief is that the resulting friendships help build trust and facilitate harmonious relations between the two firms. Personal relationships also foster an informal management network between the firms. This network can then be used to help solve problems arising in more formal contexts (such as in joint committee meetings between personnel from the two firms). 
Academics have argued that a major determinant of how much knowledge a company acquires from an alliance is its ability to learn from its alliance partner. For example, in a study of 15 strategic alliances between major multinationals, Gary Hamel, Yves Doz, and C. K. Prahalad focused on a number of alliances between Japanese companies and Western (European or American) partners. In every case in which a Japanese company emerged from an alliance stronger than its Western part-ner, the Japanese company had made a greater effort to learn. Few of the Western companies studied seemed to want to learn from their Japanese partners. They tended to regard the alliance purely as a cost-sharing or risk-sharing arrangement, rather than an opportunity to learn how a potential competitor does business. 
For an example of an alliance in which there was a clear learning asymmetry, con-sider the agreement between GM and Toyota to build the Chevrolet Nova. This alli-ance was structured as a formal joint venture, New United Motor Manufacturing, in which both parties had a 50% equity stake. The venture owned an auto plant in Fre-mont, California. According to one of the Japanese managers, Toyota achieved most of its objectives from the alliance: “We learned about U.S. supply and transportation. And we got the confidence to manage U.S. workers.” All that knowledge was then quickly transferred to Georgetown, Kentucky, where Toyota opened a plant of its own in 1986. Today, Toyota has 12 plants in the United States (although the Fremont plant was closed in 2010 and sold to Tesla). By contrast, although GM got a new product (the Nova), some GM managers complained that their new knowledge was never put to good use inside GM. They say that they should have been kept together as a team to educate GM’s engineers and workers about the Japanese system. Instead, they were dispersed to different GM subsidiaries. 
When entering an alliance, a company must take measures to ensure that it learns from its alliance partner and then embeds that knowledge within its own organiza-tion. One suggested approach is to educate all operating employees about the partner’s strengths and weaknesses, and to make clear to them how acquiring particular skills will bolster their company’s competitive position. For such learning to be of value, the knowledge acquired from an alliance must be diffused throughout the organization—which did not happen at GM. To spread knowledge, the managers involved in an alliance should be used as a resource to educate others within the company about the skills of the alliance partner.
